Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1738
Collection of taxes; when stricken from tax list.

The county board shall cause delinquent taxes on personalty, mobile homes, cabin trailers, manufactured homes, or similar property assessed and taxed as improvements to leased land to be stricken from the tax list. Such delinquent taxes shall only be stricken if (1) at least two years have expired, (2) the treasurer has used due diligence to collect such taxes, and (3)(a) it appears from the return of the treasurer that any person charged with the taxes has removed out of the county or has died and left no property out of which the taxes can be paid or (b) it appears impossible to collect such taxes.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 165, p. 450;

R.S.1913, § 6494;

Laws 1915, c. 110, § 1, p. 259;

C.S.1922, § 6021;

C.S.1929, § 77-1926;

R.S.1943, § 77-1738;

Laws 1947, c. 260, § 1, p. 849;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 168;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 68.